vi: Tiêu chuẩn lắp đặt kẹp phanh: Khớp cantilever; Gắn ở giữa; Gắn trực tiếp; Trục kép; Gắn phẳng; IS (Tiêu chuẩn quốc tế); Ngàm dọc; Kéo ngang; Khác
nl: Remklauw montagestandaard: Cantilever-nok; Center-mount; Direct-mount; Dual pivot; Flat-mount; IS (International Standard); Post-mount; Side pull; Overig
pt-BR: Padrão de montagem da pinça de freio: Cantilever boss; Fixação central; Direct mount; Pivô duplo; Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount; Tração lateral; Outro
de: Bremssattel-Montagestandard: Cantilever-Sockel; Center Mount; Direct Mount; Dual-Pivot; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount; Seitenzug; Sonstige
el: Πρότυπο τοποθέτησης δαγκάνας: Βάση cantilever; Κεντρική βάση; Απευθείας βάση; Διπλού άξονα; Επίπεδη βάση; IS (Διεθνές Πρότυπο); Βάση Post; Πλευρικής έλξης; Άλλο
fi: Jarrusatulan kiinnitysstandardi: Cantilever-kiinnike; Keskikiinnitys; Suorakiinnitys; Kaksinivelkiinnitys; Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount; Sivuveto; Muu
ko: 캘리퍼 장착 표준: 캔틸레버 보스; 센터 마운트; 다이렉트 마운트; 듀얼 피벗; 플랫 마운트; IS(국제 표준); 포스트 마운트; 사이드 풀; 기타
hr-HR: Standard montaže čeljusti: Konzolni nosač; Središnji nosač; Izravni nosač; Dvostruki zglob; Ravni nosač; IS (međunarodni standard); Stupni nosač; Bočno povlačenje; Ostalo
ja: キャリパー取り付け規格: カンチレバーボス; センターマウント; ダイレクトマウント; デュアルピボット; フラットマウント; IS (インターナショナルスタンダード); ポストマウント; サイドプル; その他
sl-SI: Standard montaže čeljusti: Nastavek za konzolo; Sredinska namestitev; Neposredna namestitev; Dvojni zatič; Ploska namestitev; IS (mednarodni standard); Namestitev Post mount; Stranski vlek; Drugo
th: มาตรฐานการติดตั้งก้ามปูเบรก: หลักเบรกผีเสื้อ; ยึดกลาง; ยึดตรง; จุดหมุนคู่; Flat mount; IS (มาตรฐานสากล); Post mount; ดึงข้าง; อื่นๆ
en: Caliper mounting standard: Cantilever boss; Center mount; Direct mount; Dual pivot; Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount; Side pull; Other
nb: Standard kalipermontering: Cantilever-feste; Senterfeste; Direktemontering; Dobbel pivot; Flatmontering; IS (International Standard); Post mount; Sidetrekk; Annet
pl: Standard mocowania zacisku: Piwoty Cantilever; Mocowanie centralne; Mocowanie Direct mount; Dual pivot; Mocowanie Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Mocowanie Post mount; Side pull; Inne
da: Standard for montering af bremsekaliper: Cantilever-studs; Centermontering; Direkte montering; Dual pivot; Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount; Sidetræk; Andet
fr: Norme de montage de l’étrier: Tasseau Cantilever; Fixation centrale; Fixation directe; Double pivot; Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount; Tirage latéral; Autre
lt-LT: Suporto montavimo standartas: „Cantilever“ tvirtinimas; Centrinis tvirtinimas; Tiesioginis tvirtinimas; Dvigubos ašies („Dual pivot“); Plokščiasis tvirtinimas („Flat mount“); IS (tarptautinis standartas); „Post mount“ tvirtinimas; Šoninio traukimo; Kita
it: Standard di montaggio della pinza: Perno cantilever; Montaggio centrale; Montaggio diretto; Doppio perno; Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount; Tiraggio laterale; Altro
sv: Monteringsstandard för bromsok: Cantilever-tappar; Centrumfäste; Direktfäste; Dubbla vridpunkter; Platt fäste; IS (International Standard); Stolpfäste; Sidodrag; Övrigt
ru: Стандарт крепления суппорта: Кантилеверный тормоз; Центральное крепление; Прямое крепление; Двойной шарнир (Dual pivot); Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount; С боковой тягой (Side pull); Другое
ro-RO: Standard de montare a etrierului: Pivot Cantilever; Montare centrală; Montare directă; Pivot dual; Montare plată; IS (Standard internațional); Montare Post mount; Tragere laterală; Altele
cs: Standard montáže brzdového třmenu: Cantilever čep; Středové uchycení; Přímé uchycení; Dual pivot; Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount; Side pull; Jiné
tr: Kaliper montaj standardı: Kantilever yuvası; Orta montaj; Doğrudan montaj; Çift pivotlu; Düz montaj; IS (Uluslararası Standart); Post mount; Yandan çekmeli; Diğer
sk-SK: Štandard montáže strmeňa: Výstupok pre konzolovú brzdu; Stredový úchyt; Priamy úchyt; Dvojčapový; Plochý úchyt; IS (International Standard); Stĺpikový úchyt; S bočným ťahom; Iné
pt-PT: Padrão de montagem da pinça: Pino cantilever; Montagem central; Montagem direta; Pivot duplo; Montagem plana; IS (Padrão internacional); Montagem post; Tração lateral; Outro
bg-BG: Стандарт за закрепване на спирачния апарат: Конзолен монтаж (cantilever); Централен монтаж; Директен монтаж; Двоен шарнир (Dual pivot); Плосък монтаж; IS (международен стандарт); Post монтаж; Странично дърпане; Други
hu: Féknyereg-rögzítési szabvány: Cantilever rögzítőszem; Középső rögzítés; Közvetlen rögzítés; Kétforgáspontos; Lapos rögzítés; IS (Nemzetközi szabvány); Oszlopos rögzítés; Oldalhúzós; Egyéb
es: Estándar de montaje de la pinza de freno: Soporte cantilever; Montaje central; Montaje directo; Pivote dual; Montaje plano; IS (Estándar internacional); Montaje tipo poste; Tiro lateral; Otro
zh-CN: 卡钳安装标准: 悬臂式底座; 中心安装; 直装式; 双枢轴; 平装式; IS（国际标准）; 柱装式; 侧拉式; 其他
zh-TW: 卡鉗安裝標準: 懸臂座; 置中安裝; 直接安裝; 雙樞軸; 平面安裝; IS (國際標準); 柱式安裝; 側拉; 其他